Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.690

Victim and witness notification program.

Information and records related to notification or registration for notification as described in RCW 36.28A.455 are exempt from disclosure under this chapter.

[ 2022 c 82 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 82: See note following RCW 72.09.712.